New Jersey, session 222, A3363.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Novice teacher means a teacher eligible to work under a valid certificate of eligibility or certificate of eligibility with advanced standing who has not yet been issued a provisional certificate. School district means a school district, charter school, renaissance school project, county special services school district, county vocational school district, or approved private school for students with disabilities. 2.    a.  The Department of Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the Department of Education shall, within 180 days of the effective date of this act, establish and maintain a database of novice teachers that shall be available to school districts and novice teachers to assist in filling staffing vacancies.  The database shall not be available to the general public. b.    The Commissioner of Education shall provide the following information for each novice teacher to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development to be included in the database established pursuant to subsection a. of this section: (1)   the novice teachers name, telephone number, email address, and method by which a school district may contact the novice teacher; (2)   the novice teachers current employment status; (3)   the certificate and endorsement held by the novice teacher; and (4)   any other information the Commissioner of Education deems necessary. c.     The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall develop a mechanism by which a novice teacher may opt out of inclusion in the database.  A novice teacher may request to be excluded from the database at any time. d.    A novice teacher may request the contact information included in the database pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section be limited to a preferred method of contact.  The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall comply with a request made by a novice teacher pursuant to this subsection. 3.    a.  The Department of Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the Department of Education, shall hold three job fairs per year to assist school districts in filling staffing vacancies, with one job fair held in each of the northern, central, and southern regions of the State. b.    (1)  The Commissioner of Education shall invite school districts to participate in the job fairs. (2)   The job fair shall be open to novice teachers included in the database established pursuant to section 2 of this act, individuals enrolled in an educator preparation program, and any other individual appropriately certified to work in a public school in the State. c.     The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall notify each novice teacher included in the database established pursuant to section 2 of this act of the date, time, and location of each job fair. d.    The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development may charge employer participants a reasonable, nominal fee to participate in a job fair held pursuant to this section.  The fee obtained pursuant to this subsection shall only be used to cover costs associated with identifying and securing a location for the job fair, hospitality services, and other administrative costs as determined by the commissioner. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.